morphology/task_3/src/task_2/english.lexc
! Declare multicharacter strings
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl

! Decalre `Root`
LEXICON Root

Noun ;

! Declare `Noun` lexicon
LEXICON Noun

ally    Ninf ;
brush   Ninf ;
bus     Ninf ;
cat     Ninf ;
city    Ninf ;
formula Ninf ;
fox     Ninf ;
goose   Ninf ;
panic   Ninf ;
play    Ninf ;
topaz   Ninf ;
torch   Ninf ;
try     Ninf ;
watch   Ninf ;

! Declare parallel forms
formula+N+Pl:formulae # ;

! Declare `Ninf` lexicon
LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0   # ;
+N+Pl:^s  # ;
